Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2495
Research; appropriations; legislative intent.

(1) The Legislature intends to support opioid misuse prevention research, opioid addiction research, and population, clinical, translational, and basic science research proposals to decrease the harmful impact of the opioid epidemic on Nebraska and carry out the purposes of the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to annually appropriate two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the General Fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for research at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, which shall only be used for research on opioid misuse prevention research, opioid addiction research, or population, clinical, translational, and basic science research proposals to decrease the harmful impact of the opioid epidemic on Nebraska. It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for purposes of this section are offset by a reduction in funds for Behavioral Health Aid for fiscal year 2024-25.

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 15.